California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
“Immediate harvest value” means the amount that each species or subclassification of timber would sell for on the stump at a voluntary sale made in the ordinary course of business for purposes of immediate harvest. Such immediate harvest values shall be expressed in terms of amount to the nearest dollar per thousand board feet, net Scribner Decimal C log rule, or other unit of measure chosen by the board, and shall be determined in a manner which makes reasonable and adequate allowances for age, size, quality, costs of removal, accessibility to point of conversion, market conditions and all other relevant factors as determined by the board.

For the purposes of this section, the immediate harvest value of Christmas trees shall be the sale price of the Christmas trees in quantities of 100 trees or more in the market area nearest to the place where the trees are cut.

Prior to December 31, 1976, and periodically thereafter as determined by the board, the board in consultation with the Timber Advisory Committee and with the California Division of Forestry and after public hearings, shall adopt rules and regulations establishing a standard unit of measure and establishing conversion factors which convert prevalent units of measure in use in California to Scribner Decimal C log rule or other unit of measure chosen as a standard.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38110.

“Yield tax” means the dollar amount derived by multiplying the net volume of harvested timber by the appropriate immediate harvest value per unit and by the yield tax rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of the Tax [38115. - 38116.]

38115.

A timber yield tax is hereby imposed on every timber owner who harvests his timber or causes it to be harvested on or after April 1, 1977, and on every timber owner of felled or downed timber who acquires title to such felled or downed timber in this state from an exempt person or agency described in Section 38104 on or after that date, and on every person who, without authorization, intentionally or unintentionally harvests or causes to be harvested timber owned by another, at the rate of 6 percent of the total immediate harvest value of that timber or at such other rate as may be fixed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 38202) of this
 part. The immediate harvest value shall be determined as of the scaling date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 947, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

38116.

(a) Subject to the limitation in subdivision (b), there is exempted from the tax imposed by this part timber whose immediate harvest value is so low that, if not exempt, the tax on the timber would amount to less than the cost of administering and collecting the tax, as determined by the board by rule. The board, after consultation with the Timber Advisory Committee, shall establish by rule the level at which the tax that would apply is less than the cost to administer and collect the tax.

(b) The board shall have no authority to exempt timber with an estimated immediate harvest value of more than three thousand dollars ($3,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 591, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Determination of Rates [38202. - 38204.]

38202.

During December, 1978, and December of each subsequent year, after public hearings, the board shall adjust the yield tax rate to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent in the same proportion that the average rate of general property taxation in the rate adjustment counties in the current tax year differs from the average rate of general property taxation in the rate adjustment counties in the preceding tax year. The board shall compute the average rate of general property taxation in the rate adjustment counties by (a) adding the county, city, school district, and other general taxes, but not the special taxes on intangibles, aircraft, or any other
 property, which is subject to a uniform statewide tax rate, nor special assessments, and (b) dividing the amount obtained by the total assessed valuation in the rate adjustment counties, exclusive of the homeowners’ and business inventory exemptions, as shown by the county tax rolls for the same year.

“Total assessed valuation,” as used in this section, does not include the assessment of property which is subject to a uniform statewide tax rate.

“Special assessment” as used in this section, means any amount levied solely against land or land and improvements.

When calculating the yield tax rate for the 1981–82 fiscal year, the 1980–81 average rate of general property taxation should first be divided by four.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 261, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

38203.

On or before December 31, 1978, and on or before December 31 of each year thereafter, the board shall certify to the Director of Finance and to the Legislature the rate determined pursuant to Section 38202, and such rate shall be the yield tax rate applied under Section 38115 for the 12-month period beginning on the next succeeding January 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38204.

(a) On or before December 31, 1976, and periodically thereafter as determined by the board, the board after consultation with the Timber Advisory Committee and after public hearings held pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, shall designate areas containing timber having similar growing, harvesting, and marketing conditions to be used as timber value areas for the preparation and application of immediate harvest values. The board may designate areas for timber standing on lands owned by local agencies and on timberland as defined
 in Section 51104 of the Government Code and designate separate areas for timber standing on national forest lands owned by the United States government. On or before March 1, 1977, for timber harvested between April 1 and December 31, 1977, and on or before December 31, 1977, and on June 30 and December 31 of each year thereafter for timber harvested during the succeeding two calendar quarters, the board, after consultation with the Timber Advisory Committee, shall estimate the immediate harvest values of each species or subclassification of timber within those areas as of the initial date of the period. These values shall be determined under rules adopted pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act from the best evidence available, including (1) gross proceeds from sales on the stump of similar timber of like quality and character at similar locations, or (2) gross proceeds from sales of logs, or of finished products, adjusted to reflect only the portion of those proceeds attributable to value on the stump
 immediately prior to harvest, or a combination of (1) and (2), and shall be determined in a manner that makes reasonable allowance for differences in age, size, quality, cost of removal, accessibility to point of conversion, market conditions and other relevant factors.

(b) The board, either on its own motion after consultation with the Timber Advisory Committee or in response to application from a timber owner, may modify the immediate harvest values to reflect material changes in timber values that result from fire, blowdown, ice storm, flood, disease, insect damage or other cause, for any area or part thereof in which damaged timber is located. The board shall specify any additional accounting or other requirements to be complied with in reporting and paying the tax on that timber.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1222, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Registration [38351. - 38351.]

38351.

Every person who owns timber subject to a timber harvest plan, every person who is required to file a notice of timber operations with the State Forester, every person who owns timber maintained for eventual harvest as Christmas trees, and every person who is the first person who acquires either legal title or beneficial title to downed timber or timber after it has been felled from land owned by a federal agency or any other person or agency or entity exempt from state taxation under the Constitution or laws of the United States or under the Constitution or laws of the State of California, shall register with the board giving such information as the
 board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 646, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Determinations [38401. - 38455.]



  ARTICLE 1. Returns and Payments [38401. - 38405.5.]

38401.

The taxes imposed by this part are due and payable to the board quarterly on or before the last day of the month next succeeding each quarterly period in which the scaling date for the timber harvested occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38402.

On or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter, a return for the preceding quarterly period shall be filed with the board in such form as the board may prescribe. The return shall include the following information with respect to timber harvested by the timber owner in the preceding calendar quarter: the volume harvested and the number of Christmas trees cut; the quarter the timber was harvested and the quarter the Christmas trees were cut; the date or dates the timber was scaled; the species; and any other information deemed necessary by the board for the administration of this part. At the
 assessor’s request, the board shall provide copies of these returns to the assessor of the county from which the timber was harvested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1281, Sec. 46.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

38403.

The person required to file the return shall deliver the return together with a remittance of the amount of the tax due to the office of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38404.

The department, if it deems it necessary in order to insure payment to or facilitate the collection by the state of the amount of taxes, may require returns and payment of the amount of taxes for quarterly periods other than calendar quarters, or for other than quarterly periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 31.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38405.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration for good cause may extend for not to exceed one month the time for making any return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration
 within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the tax, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, as defined in Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax would have been due without the extension until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 32.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38405.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), if the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any tax required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration
 of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 44.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [38411. - 38419.]

38411.

If the board is not satisfied with the return or returns of the tax or the amount of tax required to be paid to the state by any person, it may compute and determine the amount required to be paid upon the basis of the facts contained in the return or returns or upon the basis of any information within its possession or that may come into its possession. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount due for one or for more than one period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38412.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, as defined in Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 33.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38413.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments. The interest on underpayments and overpayments shall be computed in the manner set forth in Sections 38451 and 38606.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38414.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38415.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38416.

The department shall give to the person written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the person at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served.
 Service made pursuant to this subdivision is complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The taxpayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the taxpayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed complete at the time
 the department electronically transmits the notice via the taxpayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 55.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38417.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade this part or authorized rules and regulations, or failure to make a return, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be served within three years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires the later. In the case of failure to make a return, every notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the amount is proposed to be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 56.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38418.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 57.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38419.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 38417 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the taxpayer has consented in writing to the service of the notice after such time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 58.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determinations if No Return Made [38421. - 38425.]

38421.

If any person fails to make a return, the board shall make an estimate of the amount of the total timber harvested by the person and the immediate harvest value of that timber. The estimate shall be made for the period or periods in respect to which the person failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information which is in the board’s possession or may come into its possession. Upon the basis of this estimate the board shall compute and determine the amount required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one period.
 When a person discontinues activities subject to the tax, a determination may be made at any time thereafter, within the periods specified in Section 38417, as to liability arising out of the person’s activities subject to the tax, irrespective of whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise specified in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 428.)
-------------------------------------------

38422.

In making a deterimination the board may offset overpayments for a period or periods, together with interest on the overpayments, against underpayments for another period or periods, against penalties, and against the interest on the underpayments. The interest on underpayments and overpayments shall be computed in the manner set forth in Sections 38451 and 38606.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38423.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, as defined in Section 6591.5, from the last day of the month following the quarterly period for which the amount or any portion thereof should have been returned until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 34.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38424.

If the failure of any person to file a return is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or rules and regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the 10 percent penalty provided in Section 38421.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38425.

Promptly after making its determination the department shall give to the person written notice of the estimate, determination, and penalty, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 59.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations [38431. - 38435.]

38431.

If the board believes that the collection of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state or of any determination will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the tax or amount of tax required to be collected, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount determined is immediately due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38432.

If the amount specified in the determination is not paid within 10 days after service of notice thereof upon the person against whom the determination is made, the amount becomes final at the expiration of the 10 days, and the delinquency penalty and the interest provided in Section 38451 shall attach to the amount of the tax or the amount of the tax required to be collected, unless a petition for redetermination is filed within the 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

38433.

The person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter. He shall, however, file the petition for redetermination with the board within 10 days after the service upon him of notice of the determination. The person shall also within the 10-day period deposit with the board such security as it may deem necessary to insure compliance with this part. The security may be sold by the board in the manner prescribed by Section 38501.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38434.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 60.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38435.

In accordance with those rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To establish that the determination is excessive.

(b) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination or any part thereof shall be delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to the person.

(c) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person.

(d) To request a stay of collection activities.

The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. No security need be posted to file the application and to obtain this hearing. However, if the person does not deposit within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 38433, such security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except the sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely application for an administrative hearing, the board
 may allow a filing of this application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect provisions of Section 38432 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [38441. - 38447.]

38441.

Any person against whom a determination is made under Articles 2 or 3 of this chapter or any person directly interested may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after service upon the person of notice thereof. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the detemination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38442.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petitioner for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38443.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the person has so requested in his petition, shall grant the person an oral hearing and shall give him 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38444.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 38415 or Section 38424 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the last day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the increase is asserted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38445.

The order or decision of the board upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after service upon the petitioner of notice thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38446.

All determinations made by the board under Articles 2 or 3 of this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

38447.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 61.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest and Penalties [38451. - 38455.]

38451.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), a person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under Articles 2 or 3 of this chapter, within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of the tax, in addition to the tax or the amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the date on which the tax or the amount of tax required to be collected became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a person who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 38401 or the due date established by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration in accordance with Section 38404, shall pay a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) A person who is liable for the penalties described in this section shall pay either the penalty described in subdivision (a) or the penalty described in subdivision (b), whichever is greater.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 35.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38451.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the tax was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of the tax was made one business day after the date the tax was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that tax payment.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(2) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

 (3) “Modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination if no
 return has been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the department.

(d) This section shall apply only to electronic payments of taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 36.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

38452.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 38421 and 38451.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of
 the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provides for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 45.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

38453.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 38405, 38423, and 38451.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area identified in
 a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 46.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

38454.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s
 written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 6.5.)
-------------------------------------------

38454.5.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of tax liability is
 attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported tax liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including
 interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar quarters subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar quarter that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know”
 means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a timber owner who harvests timber or causes it to be harvested, is first to acquire title to felled or downed timber from an exempt person or agency, or without authorization, harvests or causes to be harvested timber owned by another to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a timber owner, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

38455.
